Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-116
Incorporation as city of the first class; applicability of existing law.

All ordinances, bylaws, acts, regulations, rules and proclamations, existing and in force in any city at the time of its incorporation as a city of the first class, shall remain in full force and effect after such incorporation until the same are repealed or modified by such city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 122, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 4815;

C.S.1922, § 3983;

C.S.1929, § 16-112;

R.S.1943, § 16-116.

Natural gas ordinance of second-class city remained in force at time it became a first-class city. Nebraska Natural Gas Co. v. City of Lexington, 167 Neb. 413, 93 N.W.2d 179 (1958).